Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-633.01
Special investigator; powers; referral to another law enforcement officer.

If the director has reason to believe that any alleged violation of the Commercial Dog and Cat Operator Inspection Act, any alleged violation of the rules and regulations of the department, any alleged violation of an order of the director, or any other existing condition posing a significant threat to the health or safety of the dogs or cats harbored or owned by an applicant or a licensee constitutes cruel neglect, abandonment, or cruel mistreatment pursuant to section 28-1009, the director may direct a special investigator employed by the department as authorized pursuant to section 81-201 to exercise the authorities of a law enforcement officer pursuant to sections 28-1011 and 28-1012 with respect to the dogs or cats or may request any other law enforcement officer as defined in section 28-1008 to inspect, care for, or impound the dogs or cats pursuant to sections 28-1011 and 28-1012. Any assignment of a special investigator by the director or referral to another law enforcement officer pursuant to this section shall be in cooperation and coordination with appropriate law enforcement agencies, political subdivisions, animal shelters, humane societies, and other appropriate entities, public or private, to provide for the care, shelter, and disposition of animals impounded pursuant to this section.

Laws 2015, LB360, § 22.